Florida, session 2026, HB885.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Transportation facility designations;
Department of Transportation to erect suitable markers.—
(1) That portion of U.S. 90 in Baker County between N. 3rd
Street and the Nassau County line is designated as "State
Representative/Circuit Judge Hon. John J. Crews, Jr., Memorial
Highway."
(2) That portion of S.R. 295/Navy Boulevard between Duncan
Road and S.R. 292/Gulf Beach Highway in Escambia County is
designated as "Warrior Sacrifice Way."
(3) The bridge on Moncrief Road West over the Ribault
River in Duval County is designated as "Bernard Wilkes Ribault
River Bridge."
(4) That portion of U.S. 41 between North Creek and
Blackburn Point Road in Sarasota County is designated as "Dickey
Betts Memorial Highway."
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb885-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 885 2026
(5) That portion of S.R. 5/U.S. 1 between N.E. 38th Street
and E. Commercial Boulevard in Broward County is designated as
"Phil Smith Memorial Highway."
(6) The Department of Transportation is directed to erect
suitable markers designating the transportation facilities as
described in this section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb885-01-c1